Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSFER OF DUTIES RELATED TO OIL-HEATED DWELLINGS
SECTION 1.
 The duties, functions and powers of the  State Department of Energy under
ORS 469.673 to 469.683 are imposed upon, transferred to and vested  in the Housing and
Community Services Department.
(Records and Property)
SECTION 2. (1) The Director of the State Department of Energy shall deliver  to the
Housing and Community Services Department all records and property  within the jurisdic-
tion of the director that relate to the duties, functions and powers transferred  by section 1
of this 2017 Act, and the Director of the Housing and Community  Services Department shall
take possession of the records and property.
(2) The Governor shall resolve any dispute between the State Department of  Energy and
the Housing and Community Services Department relating to transfers of records and  prop-
erty under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
(Unexpended Revenues)
SECTION 3.  (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the
State Department of Energy for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, from revenues dedi-
cated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made available for the  purpose
of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by  section 1 of
this 2017 Act are transferred to and are available for expenditure by the Housing and  Com-
munity Services Department for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, for the purpose of ad-
ministering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by  section 1 of this
2017 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 100 (SB 100-B) Page 1
(2) The  expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
expenditures by the State Department of Energy remain applicable to expenditures by  the
Housing and Community Services Department under this section.
(Action, Proceeding, Prosecution)
SECTION 4. The transfer of duties, functions and powers to the Housing and Community
Services Department by section 1 of this 2017 Act does not affect any action,  proceeding or
prosecution involving or with respect to the duties, functions  and powers begun before and
pending at the time of the transfer,  except that the Housing and Community Services De-
partment is substituted for the State Department of Energy  in the action, proceeding or
prosecution.
(Liability, Duty, Obligation)
SECTION 5. (1) Nothing in sections 1 to 7  of this 2017 Act relieves a person of a liability,
duty or obligation  accruing under or with respect to the duties, functions and powers
transferred by section 1 of this 2017 Act. The Housing and Community  Services Department
may undertake the collection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the State Department of  Energy legally incurred under
contracts, leases and business transactions executed, entered  into or begun before the op-
erative date of section 1 of this 2017 Act accruing under or with respect  to the duties,
functions and powers transferred by section 1  of this 2017 Act are transferred to the Housing
and Community Services Department. For the purpose of succession to these rights and  ob-
ligations, the Housing and Community Services Department is a continuation of the State
Department of Energy and not a new authority.
(Rules)
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions and powers by section 1
of this 2017 Act, the rules of the State Department of Energy with respect to such  duties,
functions or powers that are in effect on  the operative date of section 1 of this 2017 Act
continue in effect until superseded  or repealed by rules of the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department. References in  the rules of the State Department of Energy to the State
Department of Energy or an officer or employee of the  State Department of Energy are
considered to be references to the Housing  and Community Services Department or an offi-
cer or employee of the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 7. Whenever, in any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative  Assembly
or in any rule, document, record  or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, in
the context of the duties, functions and powers  transferred by section 1 of this 2017 Act,
reference is made to the  State Department of Energy, or an officer or employee of the State
Department of Energy, whose duties, functions or  powers are transferred by section 1 of this
2017 Act,  the reference is considered to be a reference to the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department or an officer or employee of  the Housing and Community Services De-
partment who by this 2017 Act  is charged with carrying out the duties, functions and powers.
REPEALS
SECTION 8. ORS 469.675, 469.677 and 469.679 are repealed.
AMENDMENTS TO STATUTES
Enrolled Senate Bill 100 (SB 100-B) Page 2
SECTION 9.  ORS 469.673 is amended to read:
469.673. As used in ORS 469.673 to 469.683:
(1) “Cash payment” means a payment made by the [ State Department of Energy ] Housing and
Community Services Department  to the dwelling owner or to the contractor on behalf of the
dwelling owner for energy conservation measures.
[(2) “Commercial lending institution” means any bank, mortgage  banking company, trust company,
savings bank, savings and  loan association, credit union, national banking association, federal savings
and loan association or federal credit union maintaining an office in this state. ]
[(3) “Cost-effective” means that  an energy conservation measure that provides or saves a specific
amount of energy during its life cycle results in the  lowest present value of delivered energy costs of
any available  alternative. However, the present value of the delivered energy costs of an energy con-
servation measure shall not be treated as greater than that  of a nonconservation energy resource or
facility unless that  cost is greater than 110 percent of the present value of the delivered energy cost of
the nonconservation energy resource or facility. ]
[(4) “Director” means the Director of the State Department of Energy appointed  under ORS
469.040.]
(2) “Contractor” means a person that installs or assists a dwelling owner  to install en-
ergy conservation measures in a dwelling.
[(5)] (3)(a)  “Dwelling” means  real or personal property within the state inhabited as the prin-
cipal residence of a dwelling owner or a tenant.
(b) “Dwelling” includes a manufactured  dwelling as defined in ORS 446.003, a floating home as
defined in ORS 830.700 and a single unit in multiple-unit residential housing.
(c) “Dwelling” does not include a recreational vehicle as defined in ORS 446.003.
[(6)] (4) “Dwelling owner” means the person:
(a) Who has  legal title to a dwelling, including the mortgagor under a duly recorded mortgage
of real property,  the trustor under a duly recorded deed of trust or a purchaser under a duly re-
corded contract for the purchase of real property; and
(b) Whose dwelling receives space heating primarily from a fuel oil dealer.
[(7) “Energy audit” means: ]
[(a) The measurement and analysis of the heat loss  and energy utilization efficiency of a
dwelling;]
[(b) An analysis of the energy savings and dollar savings potential that would result from provid-
ing energy conservation measures for the dwelling; ]
[(c) An estimate of the cost of the energy conservation measures that includes: ]
[(A) Labor for the installation of items designed to improve the space heating and energy utilization
efficiency of the dwelling; and ]
[(B) The items installed; and ]
[(d) A preliminary  assessment, including feasibility and a range of costs, of the potential and op-
portunity for installation of: ]
[(A) Passive solar space heating and solar domestic water heating in the dwelling; and ]
[(B) Solar swimming pool heating, if applicable. ]
(5) “Energy conservation items” includes  but is not limited to air sealing,
weatherstripping, ceiling and wall insulation, crawl space insulation, vapor barrier  materials,
programmable thermostats, insulation of heating ducts and water  pipes in unheated spaces,
and replacement windows.
[(8)] (6)(a)  “Energy conservation measures” [ means measures that include ] includes the instal-
lation of energy conservation  items  and the energy conservation  items installed , where the
items [ that] are primarily designed to improve the space heating and energy utilization efficiency
of a dwelling. [ These items include, but are not limited to, caulking, weatherstripping  and other infil-
tration preventative materials, ceiling and wall insulation, crawl  space insulation, vapor barrier mate-
rials, timed thermostats, insulation of heating ducts, hot water pipes and water heaters in  unheated
spaces, storm doors and windows, double glazed windows, and dehumidifiers. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 100 (SB 100-B) Page 3
(b) “Energy conservation measures” does not include the dwelling owner’s own labor.
[(9)] (7) “Fuel oil dealer” means a person, association, corporation or other form of organization
that supplies fuel oil at retail for the space heating of dwellings.
(8) “Person” means an  individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corpo-
ration, association, firm, public  service company, political subdivision, municipal corporation,
government agency, people’s utility district, or any other entity, public  or private, however
organized.
(9) “Petroleum supplier” means a petroleum refiner in this state or  any person engaged
in the wholesale distribution of distillate fuel oil in this state.
(10) “Residential customer” means a dwelling owner or tenant who is billed by  a fuel oil dealer
for fuel oil service received at the dwelling.
(11) “Space heating” means the heating of living space within a dwelling.
(12) “Tenant” means a tenant as defined in ORS 90.100 or any other tenant.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 469.681 is amended to read:
469.681. (1) Each petroleum supplier shall annually pay to  the [ State Department of Energy ]
Housing and Community Services Department its share of a petroleum supplier assessment.
[annually its share of an assessment to fund: ]
[(a) Information, assistance and technical advice required of fuel oil  dealers under ORS 469.675
for which the Director of the State Department of Energy contracts under ORS 469.677; and ]
[(b) Cash payments to a dwelling owner or contractor for energy conservation measures. ]
(2) Moneys received by the department under this section shall  be deposited in the Oil-
Heated Dwellings Energy Account to be used only to fund:
(a) Provision by the department of information, assistance and  technical advice to resi-
dential customers of fuel oil  dealers, including information about energy conservation
measures and home energy audits as that term is defined in ORS 469.703;
(b) Cash payments to a dwelling owner or contractor  for energy conservation measures;
and
(c) The administration and enforcement of ORS 469.673 to 469.683.
[(2)] (3)  The amount of the assessment required  by subsection (1) of this section shall be deter-
mined by the Director of the Housing and Community Services Department  in a  manner con-
sistent with the method prescribed in ORS 469.421. The aggregate amount  of the assessment shall
not exceed $400,000. In making this assessment, the director shall exclude all  gallons of distillate
fuel oil sold by petroleum suppliers that are subject to  the requirements of [ section 3a, ] Article IX ,
section 3a,  of the Oregon Constitution, or ORS 319.020 or 319.530.
[(3)] (4)  If any petroleum supplier fails to pay any amount assessed to it  under this section
within 30 days after the payment is  due, the Attorney General, on behalf of the [ State Department
of Energy ] Housing and Community Services Department , may institute a proceeding in  the cir-
cuit court to collect the amount due.
[(4)] (5)  Interest on delinquent assessments shall be added to and paid at the rate of one and
one-half percent of the  payment due per month or fraction of a month from the date the payment
was due to the date of payment.
[(5)] (6)  The assessment required by subsection (1) of  this section is in addition to any assess-
ment required by ORS 469.421 (8), and any other fee or assessment required by law.
[(6) As used in this section, “petroleum supplier” means a petroleum refiner in this state or  any
person engaged in the wholesale distribution of distillate fuel oil in the State of Oregon. ]
SECTION 11.  ORS 469.683 is amended to read:
469.683. (1) [ There is established, separate and distinct from the General Fund, the Oil-Heated
Dwellings Energy Audit Account. ] The  Oil-Heated Dwellings Energy Account is established in
the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Oil-Heated Dwellings Energy Account  shall be credited to the account.  [Moneys deposited in the
account under subsections (2) to (5)  of this section shall be used to pay the cost of the information,
Enrolled Senate Bill 100 (SB 100-B) Page 4
assistance and technical advice required  of fuel oil dealers under ORS 469.675 for which the Director
of the State Department of Energy contracts under ORS 469.677. ]
[(2) The State  Department of Energy shall pay into the State Treasury all assessment moneys re-
ceived by the department under ORS 469.681 during  the preceding calendar month. The State Treas-
urer shall deposit the moneys to the credit of the Oil-Heated Dwellings Energy Audit Account. ]
[(3)] (2)  [ The] Moneys  in the Oil-Heated Dwellings Energy [ Audit] Account are continuously
appropriated to the [ State Department of Energy for the purpose of: ] Housing and Community
Services Department to be used only for the purposes specified in ORS 469.681 (2).
[(a) Paying the cost of information, assistance and technical advice required of  fuel oil dealers
under ORS 469.675 for which the director contracts under ORS 469.677; and ]
[(b) Providing cash payments to  a dwelling owner or contractor for energy conservation
measures.]
[(4) Notwithstanding ORS 293.140, any  interest attributable to moneys in the Oil-Heated Dwellings
Energy Audit Account shall accrue to that account. ]
[(5)] (3)  The  [ State Department of Energy ] department shall keep a record of all moneys depos-
ited in the Oil-Heated Dwellings Energy [ Audit] Account.
SECTION 12. Section 13 of this 2017 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 469.673 to
469.683.
SECTION 13.  The Housing and Community Services  Department may adopt by rule poli-
cies and procedures for the administration and enforcement of ORS 469.673 to 469.683.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS TO TAX CREDITS APPLICABLE TO PRIOR TAX YEARS
SECTION 14.  ORS 317.112 is amended to read:
317.112. (1) A credit against taxes otherwise due under this  chapter for the taxable year shall
be allowed to a commercial lending institution in an amount equal to the difference between:
(a) The amount of finance charge charged during the taxable year including  interest on the loan
and interest on any loan fee financed at an annual rate  of six and one-half percent, by the lending
institution to a dwelling owner who is or who rents to a residential fuel oil customer, or who is  or
who rents to a  wood heating resident for the purpose of financing energy conservation measures;
and
(b) The amount of finance charge that would have been charged during the taxable year,  in-
cluding interest on the loan and interest on any loan fee financed by the  lending institution for the
loan for energy conservation measures at an annual rate that is the lesser of the following:
(A) The annual rate charged by the commercial lending institution for  nonsubsidized loans made
under like terms and conditions at the time the loan for energy conservation measures is made; or
(B) An upper limit established by rule by the Director of the State Department of Energy.
(2) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under  this section that is not used by the taxpayer in a
particular year may be carried  forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the next
succeeding tax year.  Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year may be carried
forward and used in  the second succeeding tax year, and likewise until the 15th succeeding tax year.
The credit may not be carried forward beyond the 15th succeeding tax year.
(3) In order to be eligible for the tax credit  allowed under subsection (1) of this section, the loan
shall:
(a) Be made only  to an owner of an oil-heated or wood-heated dwelling who presents the results
of an energy audit pursuant to ORS 469.631  to 469.645, 469.649 to 469.659[ , 469.673 to 469.683 ] or
469.685 that is conducted by [ a fuel oil dealer, ] an  investor-owned utility or publicly owned utility
or through the State Department  of Energy, regardless of whether that [ fuel oil dealer or ] utility
provides the dwelling’s space heating energy.
(b) Be subject to an annual rate not to exceed  six and one-half percent and have a term not
exceeding 10 years.
Enrolled Senate Bill 100 (SB 100-B) Page 5
(c) Not finance  any materials installed in the construction of a new dwelling, additions to ex-
isting structures or remodeling that adds living space.
(d) Finance only  those energy conservation measures that are recommended as cost-effective in
the energy audit, and any loan fee that is included in the body of the loan.
(4) The credit allowed under this section may not be allowed  to the extent that the loan exceeds
$5,000 for a single dwelling unit, or,  if the dwelling owner is a corporation described in ORS 307.375,
to the extent that the loan exceeds $2,000 for a single dwelling unit.
(5) A commercial lending institution  may charge, finance and collect a nonrefundable front-end
loan fee,  and such a fee does not affect the eligibility of the loan for a tax credit under this section.
The fee, if any, may not exceed that charged by the lending  institution for nonsubsidized loans made
under like terms and conditions at the time the loan for energy conservation measures is made.
(6) Nothing in this section or  in rules adopted under this section shall be construed to cause a
loan to violate the usury laws of this state.
(7) As  used in this section, “annual rate,” “commercial lending institution,” “cost-effective,”
“dwelling,” “dwelling owner,” “energy audit,” “energy conservation measures,” “finance charge,”
“fuel oil dealer,” “residential fuel oil customer,” “space heating” and “wood heating resident” have
the meaning given those terms in ORS 469.710.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 469B.154 is amended to read:
469B.154. (1) The owner of a rental housing unit may transfer a tax credit for energy conser-
vation measures installed in  rental housing units under ORS 469B.151 in exchange for a cash pay-
ment equal  to the present value of the tax credit. To be eligible for a transfer, the energy
conservation  measures  must have been recommended in an energy audit as provided in ORS
469.633[,] or 469.651 [ or 469.675].
(2) The State Department of Energy may establish by rule uniform discount rates to be  used in
calculating the present value of a tax credit under this section.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 16. (1) Sections 1 to 7, 12 and 13 of this 2017 Act, the amendments  to ORS
317.112, 469.673, 469.681, 469.683 and 469B.154 by sections 9 to 11, 14 and 15 of this 2017 Act
and the  repeal of 469.675, 469.677 and 469.679 by section 8 of this 2017 Act become operative
January 1, 2018.
(2) The State Department of Energy and the Housing and Community  Services Depart-
ment may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary to enable the State Department of  Energy and the Housing and Community
Services Department  to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, all the duties, functions  and powers conferred on the State Department of
Energy and the Housing and Community Services  Department by sections 1 to 7, 12 and 13
of this 2017 Act, the amendments to ORS  317.112, 469.673, 469.681, 469.683 and 469B.154 by
sections 9 to 11, 14 and 15 of this 2017 Act and the  repeal of 469.675, 469.677 and 469.679 by
section 8 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  for
operations, from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and fed-
eral funds from the United  States Department of Housing and Urban Development for con-
tract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5012), collected or received by  the
Housing and Community Services Department, is increased by $568,250.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 5009),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
Enrolled Senate Bill 100 (SB 100-B) Page 6
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Department of Energy, is de-
creased by $568,250.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 19. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 20. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 6, 2017
Repassed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 100 (SB 100-B) Page 7